New York, session 2025-2026, S3671.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 142 of the public service law, as 2 added by section 11 of part O of chapter 58 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 3. For any municipality, political subdivision or an agency thereof 5 that has received notice of the filing of an application, pursuant to 6 regulations promulgated in accordance with this article, the munici- 7 pality or political subdivision or agency thereof shall within the time- 8 frames established by this subdivision submit a statement to ORES indi- 9 cating whether the proposed project is designed to be sited, constructed 10 and operated in compliance with applicable local laws and regulations, 11 if any, concerning the environment, or public health and safety. In the 12 event that a municipality, political subdivision or an agency thereof 13 submits a statement to ORES that the proposed project is not designed to 14 be sited, constructed or operated in compliance with local laws and 15 regulations [and ORES determines not to hold an adjudicatory hearing on 16 the application, ORES shall hold a non-adjudicatory public hearing in or 17 near one or more of the affected municipalities or political subdivi- 18 sions. In any such adjudicatory hearing, ORES or the department, shall 19 designate members of its staff to represent the public interest, includ- 20 ing with respect to the application of local and state laws] such appli- 21 cation shall be denied. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08114-01-5 S. 3671 2 1 § 2. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 142-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 142-a. Prohibition on conflicts of interest. 1. No application shall 4 be deemed completed if such application provides compensation or a host 5 agreement to a local elected official of a municipality or political 6 subdivision, government employee, or an immediate family member of such 7 a local elected official or government employee. 8 2. Where a municipality or political subdivision is to determine 9 whether a proposed project is designed to be sited, constructed or oper- 10 ated in compliance with applicable local laws and regulations pursuant 11 to section one hundred forty-two of this article, if any individual or 12 individuals who participate in voting on approving such project would 13 receive compensation or a host agreement as a result of such project 14 being approved, such individual or individuals shall be required to 15 recuse themselves from such vote. Furthermore, such individual or indi- 16 viduals shall not participate in any discussions or deliberations on 17 whether such proposed project should be approved. 18 § 3. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 149 to 19 read as follows: 20 § 149. Transparency requirements. The office of renewable energy 21 siting and electric transmissions shall establish and maintain a data- 22 base of all host agreements and land contracts related to major renewa- 23 ble energy facilities built in the state of New York. Such database 24 shall be in an electronic format on the office of renewable energy 25 siting and electric transmissions website and made available to the 26 public. Such host agreements and land contracts shall be unredacted. 27 § 4. Section 144 of the public service law, as added by section 11 of 28 part O of chapter 58 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 29 § 144. Powers of municipalities and state agencies and authorities. 1. 30 Applicants shall, prior to filing an application, conduct meetings with 31 the respective chief executive officer of all municipalities in which 32 the proposed major renewable generation facility or major electric tran- 33 smission facility will be located. The applicant shall provide as part 34 of the application presentation materials and a summary of questions 35 raised, and responses provided during such meetings with municipalities. 36 In the event the applicant is unable to secure a meeting with a relevant 37 municipality the application shall contain a detailed explanation of all 38 of the applicant's best efforts and reasonable attempts to secure such 39 meeting, including, but not limited to, written communications between 40 the applicant and the municipality. 41 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including without limi- 42 tation article eight of the environmental conservation law and article 43 VII of this chapter, no other state agency, department or authority, or 44 any municipality or political subdivision or any agency thereof may, 45 except as expressly authorized under this article or the rules and regu- 46 lations promulgated under this article, require any approval, consent, 47 permit, certificate, contract, agreement, or other condition for the 48 development, design, construction, operation, or decommissioning of [a 49 major renewable energy facility or] a major electric transmission facil- 50 ity with respect to which an application for a siting permit has been 51 filed, provided in the case of a municipality, political subdivision or 52 an agency thereof, such entity has received notice of the filing of the 53 application therefor. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the department of 54 environmental conservation shall be the permitting agency for permits 55 issued pursuant to federally delegated or federally approved programs. S. 3671 3 1 3. In the case of a major renewable energy facilities agreements with 2 a municipality or political subdivision, such municipality or political 3 subdivision may require any approval, consent, permit, certificate, 4 contract, agreement, or other condition for the development, design, 5 construction, operation, or decommissioning of a major renewable energy 6 facility prior to giving approval for an application. Such municipality 7 or political subdivision shall hire and retain independent attorneys to 8 review such agreements and applicants for a major renewable energy 9 facility that provides wind or solar power shall be prohibited from 10 providing attorneys to such municipality or political subdivision. 11 4. This section shall not impair or abrogate any federal, state or 12 local labor laws or any otherwise applicable state law for the 13 protection of employees engaged in the construction and operation of a 14 major renewable energy facility or major electric transmission facility. 15 [4.] 5. ORES and the department shall monitor, enforce and administer 16 compliance with any terms and conditions set forth in a siting permit 17 issued pursuant to this article and in doing so may use and rely on 18 authority otherwise available under this chapter. 19 § 5. The general obligations law is amended by adding a new section 20 5-338 to read as follows: 21 § 5-338. Agreements concerning the siting of major renewable energy 22 facilities. Every undertaking or promise, whether written or oral, 23 express or implied, constituting or contained, in any contract or agree- 24 ment of hiring or employment between any individual, firm, company, 25 association or corporation and any municipality or political subdivision 26 and private landowner for the sale of land for the siting of a major 27 renewable energy facility as contemplated by article eight of the public 28 service law shall not contain a clause requiring the forfeiture of 29 mineral rights. 30 § 6. The general business law is amended by adding a new article 45-A 31 to read as follows: 32 ARTICLE 45-A 33 RENEWABLE ENERGY SOLICITORS 34 Section 1510. Definitions. 35 1511. Prohibited practices. 36 1512. Violations and penalties. 37 § 1510. Definitions. As used in this article, unless the context or 38 subject matter otherwise requires: 39 1. "Renewable energy resources" shall have the same meaning as defined 40 in section 1-103 of the energy law. 41 2. "Renewable energy resources agency" shall mean a person, firm or 42 corporation engaged in business, the principal purpose of which is to 43 solicit public agencies, municipalities, or private individuals to 44 purchase a renewable energy resource power plant. 45 3. "Communication" shall mean the conveying of information regarding 46 renewable energy resources directly or indirectly to any person through 47 any medium. 48 4. "Renewable energy resources solicitor" means an individual who, as 49 part of such individual's job, to solicit agencies, municipalities, or 50 private individuals to purchase a renewal energy resource power plant. 51 § 1511. Prohibited practices. No renewable energy resources agency as 52 defined by this article, or such agency's agent shall: 53 1. Simulate in any manner a law enforcement officer, or a represen- 54 tative of any governmental agency of the state of New York or any of its 55 political subdivisions; S. 3671 4 1 2. Communicate with agencies, municipalities, or private individuals, 2 including, but not limited to, any private individuals' family or house- 3 hold members, with such frequency or at such unusual hours or in such a 4 manner as can reasonably be expected to abuse or harass the agency, 5 municipality or private individual; or 6 3. Use a communication which simulates in any manner legal or judicial 7 process, or which gives the appearance of being authorized, issued, or 8 approved by a government, governmental agency, or attorney at law when 9 it is not. 10 § 1512. Violations and penalties. 1. Except as otherwise provided by 11 law, any person who violates the terms of section fifteen hundred eleven 12 of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, and each such violation 13 shall be deemed a separate offense. 14 2. The attorney general or the district attorney of any county may 15 bring an action in the name of the people of the state to restrain or 16 prevent any violation of this article or any continuance of any such 17 violation. 18 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, the 19 amendments to article 8 of the public service law made by sections one, 20 two, three and four of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 21 article and shall be deemed repealed therewith; and provided further, 22 that sections five and six of this act shall expire and be deemed 23 repealed on the same date and in the same manner as section 11 of part O 24 of chapter 58 of the laws of 2024.